Hawaii statutes.
[§23-74] Review for 2020 and every
tenth year thereafter. (a) The exemptions and exclusions under the
general excise tax, public service company tax, or insurance premium tax listed
in subsection (c) shall be reviewed in 2020 and every tenth year thereafter.

(b) The auditor shall submit the findings and
recommendations of the reviews to the legislature and governor no later than
twenty days prior to the convening of the immediately following regular
session.

(c) This section shall apply to the following:

(1) Section 239-2, paragraph (5) of the definition of
"gross income"--Gross income of home service providers of mobile
telecommunications services;

(2) Section 239-2, exclusions under the definition of
"gross income"--Dividends paid by one member to another member of an
affiliated public service company group or gross income from the sale or
transfer of materials and supplies, interest on loans, and provision of
services among members of an affiliated public service company group;

(3) Section 237-3(b)--Gross receipts from the sale or
transfer of materials and supplies, interest on loans, and provision of
services among members of an affiliated public service company group;

(4) Section 239-5.5--Gross income of utilities from
monthly surcharges;

(5) Section 239-5.6--Gross income of electric utility
companies from cable surcharges;

(6) Section 239-6.5--Tax credit for lifeline
telephone service subsidies;

(7) Section 269-172--Green infrastructure charges
received by electric utilities;

(8) Section 237-29.7--Gross income or gross proceeds
received by insurance companies;

(9) Section 431:7-207--Tax credit to facilitate
regulatory oversight;

(10) Section 432:1-403--Exemption for nonprofit
medical indemnity or hospital service associations or societies specifically
from the general excise tax, public service company tax, or insurance premium
tax; and

(11) Section 432:2-503--Exemption for fraternal
benefit societies specifically from the general excise tax, public service
company tax, or insurance premium tax. [L 2016, c 261, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next